New York, session 2025-2026, S413.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general obligations law is amended by adding a new 2 section 5-338 to read as follows: 3 § 5-338. Release of certain employee claims. 1. For purposes of this 4 section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Employer" shall mean all public and private employers within the 6 state. 7 (b) "Employee" shall mean all public and private employees within the 8 state. 9 2. No release of any claim by an employee, or independent contractor 10 who is a natural person, against an employer, is enforceable if, as part 11 of the agreement resolving such claim, the employee or independent 12 contractor is prohibited from applying for, accepting, or engaging in 13 future employment with such employer, or any entity or entities related 14 to such employer. The provisions of this section shall not preclude an 15 employee and employer from agreeing to terminate an existing employment 16 relationship as part of a settlement of a claim. If a release of a 17 claim is rendered unenforceable pursuant to this section, the employer 18 shall remain bound by all other provisions of the settlement agreement, 19 including the obligation to provide the full consideration to the 20 employee as set forth in the agreement. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 22 have become a law and shall apply to all agreements entered into on and 23 after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00167-01-5